Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-154.01
Materiel division; University of Nebraska; purchase agreements.

The materiel division shall make available copies of current purchase agreements and standard specifications to the University of Nebraska. The University of Nebraska may utilize such purchase agreements if it determines that it would be to its advantage to do so. The materiel division may utilize purchase agreements entered into by the University of Nebraska upon a finding by the materiel administrator that the use of such agreements would be in the best interests of the state. For purposes of this section, purchase agreements do not include contracts for personal services subject to sections 73-301 to 73-307.

Laws 1981, LB 381, § 4;

Laws 2000, LB 654, § 11.